Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.090

Forest practices board—Emergency rules.

Emergency rules adopted by the forest practices board pertaining to forest practices and the protection of aquatic resources are subject to this chapter to the extent provided in RCW 76.09.055.

[ 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 202.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 sp.s. c 4 ss 201, 202, and 203: See note following RCW 76.09.055.

Part headings not law—1999 sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 77.85.180.